District of Columbia statutes.
47-205

Reimbursement of United States for space costs of United States Attorney and United States Marshal.

Beginning on the effective date of this title, the Executive Officer of the District of Columbia Courts shall reimburse to the United States from any funds in the Treasury to the credit of the District of Columbia courts the amount determined by the Administrator of General Services to be necessary to cover 75% of the costs of operation, maintenance, and repair of space used by the United States Attorney and the United States Marshal for the District of Columbia.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 591, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 173(a)(2)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-205.
1973 Ed., § 47-204a.
“This title,” referred to in this section, is title I of 84 Stat. 475, Pub. L. 91-358, approved July 29, 1970, which is codified throughout the Code.